src/esu.lexc
LEXICON NounPostbase
NounInflection;
VerbEte;
-–ngqerr[N→V]:+(r)                            SubordinativeVerbInflection; ! to have N


!-–ar[N→N]:–ar                                 NounPostbase; ! (usually does not alter meaning of noun base)
-–ar(ar*)[N→N]:–ar(ar*)                       NounPostbase; ! little piece of N
-–cengar*[N→N]:–cengar*                       NounPostbase; ! one with a small N
-–ciller[N→N]:–ciller                         NounPostbase; ! worthless N; dilapidated N
-–cuar(ar*)[N→N]:–cuar(ar*)                   NounPostbase; ! small N; tiny N; little N
-–cug[N→N]:–cug                               NounPostbase; ! unpleasing N; ugly old N; bad result of V-ing
-–cungar[N→N]:–cungar                         NounPostbase; ! cute little N; little N (NSU meaning)
-%:(ng)inar*[N→N]:%:(ng)inar*                 NounPostbase; ! merely N (nothing more)
-–irite[N→N]:–irite                           NounPostbase; ! forms names of weekdays from certain noun bases
-%:(ng)i%:rute[N→N]:%:(ng)i%:rute             NounPostbase; ! late (deceased) N; something that causes one to lose his N
-–kainer[N→N]:–kainer                         NounPostbase; ! a little bit of N; small amount of N
-+kar[N→N]:+kar                               NounPostbase; ! raw material for N; future N; unrealized N
-@kar(ar*)1[N→N]:@⁵kar(ar*)                   NounPostbase; ! small N; little N
-–kcag[N→N]:–kcag                             NounPostbase; ! something that looks like N
-–kcuar(ar*)[N→N]:–kcuar(ar*)                 NounPostbase; ! small N; little N
-–kegtaar(ar*)[N→N]:–k̲egtaar(ar*)             NounPostbase; ! good N; nice N; new N
-–kegtaar(ar*)[N→N]:–kegtaar(ar*)             NounPostbase; ! good N; nice N; new N
!-–kellriig[N→N]:–kellriig                     NounPostbase; ! the pair or group whereof one member has the other as his N
!-–kellriit[N→N]:–kellriit                     NounPostbase; ! the pair or group whereof one member has the other as his N
-@–ksagar[N→N]:@⁵–ksagar                      NounPostbase; ! very ugly N
-@ksuar(ar*)[N→N]:@⁵ksuar(ar*)                NounPostbase; ! small N
-+kuar[N→N]:+kuar                             NounPostbase; ! leftover N
-–kucir[N→N]:–kucir                           NounPostbase; ! one of the same kind as N
-–kuiner(ar*)[N→N]:–kuiner(ar*)               NounPostbase; ! small amount of N
-–kuinr(ar*)[N→N]:–kuinr(ar*)                 NounPostbase; ! small amount of N
-–kuiner[N→N]:–kuiner                         NounPostbase; ! small amount of N
-–kutar[N→N]:–k̲utar                           NounPostbase; ! thing to be used as N would be used; small N
-–kute[N→N]:–kute                             NounPostbase; ! thing to be used as N would be used; small N
-–kuyug[N→N]:–kuyug                           NounPostbase; ! small bit of N; poor N
-–kuyugar[N→N]:–kuyugar                       NounPostbase; ! small bit of N; poor N
-–leg[N→N]:–leg                               NounPostbase; ! one with N or Ns, one having N
-–lgute[N→N]:–lgute                           NounPostbase; ! one who has the same N as possessor; sharer of N
-+li1[N→N]:+li                                NounPostbase; ! one who is V; one who Vs; one having V; one similar to N
-+lir[N→N]:+lir                               NounPostbase; ! one who is V; one who Vs; one having V; one similar to N
-––liar[N→N]:––liar                           NounPostbase; ! a made N; N made by possessor
-––linrar*[N→N]:––linrar*                     NounPostbase; ! product of N; evidence or trace of N
-––linr(ar*)[N→N]:––linr(ar*)                 NounPostbase; ! (NUN form) product of N; evidence or trace of N
-–lkug[N→N]:–lkug                             NounPostbase; ! no-good, darned N
-–llar*[N→N]:–llar*                           NounPostbase; ! thing of N (often with reference to the past)
-–ller1[N→N]:–ller                            NounPostbase; ! former N; one that V-ed or was V-ed; act or state of V-ing
-–ller(ar*)[N→N]:–ller(ar*)                   NounPostbase; ! shabby, old N
-–llruar(ar*)[N→N]:–llruar(ar*)               NounPostbase; ! few N in poor condition
-@–llug[N→N]:@⁵–llug                          NounPostbase; ! bad N; one with bad N
-–lqur[N→N]:–lqur                             NounPostbase; ! old broken piece of N
-–luatar[N→N]:–luatar                         NounPostbase; ! good N
-–lugpiar[N→N]:–lugpiar                       NounPostbase; ! original N; authentic N
-–maa[N→N]:–maa                               NounPostbase; ! my N, ... ; my Ns, ...
-+mig[N→N]:+mig                               NounPostbase; ! thing held in oneʼs N
-+miar[N→N]:+miar                             NounPostbase; ! thing held in oneʼs N
-~+miu[N→N]:~+miu                             NounPostbase; ! inhabitant of N; resident of N; tribe-member of or from N
-~+miutar*[N→N]:~+miutar*                     NounPostbase; ! one whose place is N
-–mte[N→N]:–mte                               NounPostbase; ! our N, ... ; our Ns, ...
-+ner4[N→N]:+ner                              NounPostbase; ! area of N
-–nerrar*[N→N]:–nerrar*                       NounPostbase; ! new N; one that has recently V-ed
-–nerrar(ar*)[N→N]:–nerrar(ar*)               NounPostbase; ! new N; one that has recently V-ed
-–nerar(ar*)[N→N]:–nerar(ar*)                 NounPostbase; ! (NUN form) new N; one that has recently V-ed
-–ngirta'rrlugar*[N→N]:–ngirta'rrlugar*       NounPostbase; ! good old (but perhaps decrepit) N
-–ngnagar[N→N]:–ngnagar                       NounPostbase; ! poor quality N; darned N
-–ngssaar(ar*)[N→N]:–ngssaar(ar*)             NounPostbase; ! secret N
-–nguar[N→N]:–nguar                           NounPostbase; ! imitation N; inauthentic N; thing similar to or reminiscent of N; device for inauthentic V-ing
-–ngyaar(ar*)[N→N]:–ngyaar(ar*)               NounPostbase; ! old N (person)
-–ngiar(ar*)[N→N]:–ngiar(ar*)                 NounPostbase; ! old N (person)
-+nir1[N→N]:+nir                              NounPostbase; ! since N; since some time in the N
-+nir2[N→N]:+nir                              NounPostbase; ! the smell of N
!-%:(e)nkut[N→N]:%:(e)nkut                     EncliticOrEnd; ! (plural) N and family; N and companion
!-%:(e)nkuk[N→N]:%:(e)nkuk                     EncliticOrEnd; ! (dual) N and family; N and companion
-–paarrlug[N→N]:–paarrlug                     NounPostbase; ! big N
-–pig1[N→N]:–pig                              NounPostbase; ! genuine N; real N; authentic N
-–piar[N→N]:–piar                             NounPostbase; ! genuine N; real N; authentic N
-–pigar[N→N]:–pigar                           NounPostbase; ! genuine N; real N; authentic N
-–qainar[N→N]:–q̲ainar                         NounPostbase; ! only N; merely N
-+qar[N→N]:+qar                               NounPostbase; ! N area of possessor; exact area denoted by N with respect to possessor
-–qlikacaar(ar*)[N→N]:–q̲likacaar(ar*)         NounPostbase; ! one that is the farthest in the area denoted by N
-–qlir*[N→N]:–q̲lir*                           NounPostbase; ! the one located far in the area or space or time denoted by N
-–qtar*[N→N]:–q̲tar*                           NounPostbase; ! weak, helpless, worthless N; dear N
-–qva[N→N]:–q̲va                               NounPostbase; ! area far in the direction of N
-–qvaar*[N→N]:–q̲vaar*                         NounPostbase; ! area far in the direction of N
-–r'aya'ar[N→N]:–r̲'aya'ar                     NounPostbase; ! multitude of Ns; lots of Ns
-–rpaa(ar*)[N→N]:–r̲paa(ar*)                   NounPostbase; ! great N; oldest N (with kinship terms)
-–rpag|@vag[N→N]:–r̲pag|@²vag                  NounPostbase; ! large N; big N
!-@vag/?vag[N→N]:@vag/?vag                     NounPostbase; ! big N; large N
-–rpallr(ar*)[N→N]:–r̲pallr(ar*)               NounPostbase; ! very large N
-–rpallug[N→N]:–r̲pallug                       NounPostbase; ! one that is primarily or mostly N
-–rqu[N→N]:–r̲qu                               NounPostbase; ! N times

LEXICON ProperNoun
Caarillug              NounPostbase; ! Shageluk
Iqug                   NounPostbase; ! Ekuk
Qairuarmiut            NounPostbase; ! legendary village set on high ground in the world of the “little people” (ircenrraat)
LEXICON NounBase
aarraalir              NounPostbase; ! (HBC form) long-tailed duck (oldsquaw duck) (Clangula hyemalis)
agyar                  NounPostbase; ! star; club (in playing cards)
akulqucug              NounPostbase; ! gap; crack between boards, etc.
aluqute                NounPostbase; ! beaver scent-gland; castor
angayuurrar            NounPostbase; ! sweetheart
anutiir                NounPostbase; ! birthday
arnartar*              NounPostbase; ! thing belonging or pertaining to women
atmag                  NounPostbase; ! backpack; knapsack; costume (additional meaning in HBC)
ayuqucir               NounPostbase; ! what something is like; its condition; characteristic
caqelngaur             NounPostbase; ! one leg area of a seal
cetugyugute            NounPostbase; ! seal-calling stick
cilumcuksugar          NounPostbase; ! snow bunting (Plectrophenax nivalis); any small bird
civuar                 NounPostbase; ! incisor tooth
curukar                NounPostbase; ! challenger-guest; member of the group from the village to which the messengers are sent during a challenge feast and that competes against the host village
eliver                 NounPostbase; ! (K form), elivneq (Y form) grave marker; possession of deceased person placed on his grave according to a former traditional custom
epurraleg              NounPostbase; ! lollipop; small pot with a small handle
igarte                 NounPostbase; ! writer; secretary
ilairtaayuli           NounPostbase; ! small biting gnat (species ?)
ingluirner             NounPostbase; ! sand dune eroded on the side
irnivkariste           NounPostbase; ! midwife
kalagar                NounPostbase; ! walleye or pacific pollock (Theragra chalcogramma)
kapit'ar               NounPostbase; ! gut rain parka
keciqutar              NounPostbase; ! water container (made from walrus bladder)
keniraraute            NounPostbase; ! dance baton
kinguqlir*             NounPostbase; ! younger sibling; one at the rear
kumlu                  NounPostbase; ! thumb
mainar                 NounPostbase; ! prospector; miner
maslar                 NounPostbase; ! (NUN form) butter
mikelngur*             NounPostbase; ! child; little one
nakunar                NounPostbase; ! type of large snail (species ?)
naterkar               NounPostbase; ! sole material for skin boots, made from the tanned skin of the bearded seal
nengulercissuute       NounPostbase; ! scraper for fawn skins; tanning tool for softening and stretching skin
nukar                  NounPostbase; ! beaver in its second year; younger sibling (NSU meaning)
pagkullr(ar*)          NounPostbase; ! raven (Corvus corax)
pekeryar               NounPostbase; ! crooked part of a tree; bend in tree limb
pilu'uvkaar            NounPostbase; ! rope
putulri                NounPostbase; ! loop for bootlace on a skin boot or other such thing
qaltaur(ar*)           NounPostbase; ! bucket; pail
qaquaqnginar           NounPostbase; ! single-bladed paddle hand grip at upper end that is one piece with the handle
qecirvig               NounPostbase; ! spittoon; spit can
qerruutar              NounPostbase; ! (qeruutaq ?) clouds on the horizon all around but with blue sky above
qip'ayagar*            NounPostbase; ! smaller diameter intertwined thread; wire (NUN meaning)
qupanuar(ar*)          NounPostbase; ! gray jay; camp robber (Perisoreus canadensis)
segvig                 NounPostbase; ! dock
takumcukute            NounPostbase; ! mercy; pity; compassion
taqsipag               NounPostbase; ! African-American; black person; Negro
tugkarar               NounPostbase; ! walrus tusk
uil'kar                NounPostbase; ! fork
uquliurte              NounPostbase; ! oil worker; oilfield worker
yukutar                NounPostbase; ! moisture; dampness; mildew
